src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_verbs.lexc
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2SgSubj+%0SgObj:yin EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObvSubj+%0PlObj:nid EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObvSubj+%0SgObj:nid EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj+%0PlObj:waad EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj+%0SgObj:waad EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObvSubj+%0PlObj:nid EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObvSubj+%0SgObj:nid EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProxSubj+%0PlObj:d EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProxSubj+%0SgObj:d EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+ExclSubj+%0PlObj:yaang EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+ExclSubj+%0SgObj:yaang EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+InclSubj+%0PlObj:yang EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+InclSubj+%0PlObj:ying EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+InclSubj+%0SgObj:yang EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+InclSubj+%0SgObj:ying EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+%0PlObj:ng EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+%0SgObj:ng EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+%0PlObj:yaambaan EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+%0SgObj:yaambaan EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+%0PlObj:yegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+%0PlObj:yegoban EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+%0SgObj:yegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+%0SgObj:yegoban EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+%0PlObj:yamban EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+%0SgObj:yamban EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj+%0PlObj:nipan EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj+%0SgObj:nipan EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+%0PlObj:waapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+%0SgObj:waapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObvSubj+%0PlObj:nipan EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObvSubj+%0SgObj:nipan EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+%0PlObj:pan EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+%0SgObj:pan EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+%0PlObj:yaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+%0SgObj:yaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj+%0PlObj:yangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj+%0SgObj:yangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+%0PlObj:ngiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+%0SgObj:ngiban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTI, Class: VTI_oo                                         !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary
0:%>%> VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTI, Class: VTI_oo                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Flags
@R.Prefix.%<CHCNJ%>@ VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Flags_Prefix=%<CHCNJ%> ;
@R.Prefix.GAA-@ VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Flags_Prefix=GAA- ;
@R.Prefix.GI@ VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;
@R.Prefix.O@ VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Flags_Prefix=O ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTI, Class: VTI_oo                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Other@ VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTI, Class: VTI_oo, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj               !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTI_Stems
aabiskwa'oodoon:aabiskwa'ood VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
aaboojiigibidoon:aaboojiigibid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
aagotoosidoon:aagotoosid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
aandakiisidoon:aandakiisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
aanikoopidoon:aanikoopid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
aanjitoon:aanjit VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
aapidaapitoon:aapidaapit VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
aaswaakwakidoon:aaswaakwakid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
aateyaabaadoon:aateyaabaad VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
aayaagwiitoosidoon:yaagwiitoosid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
aazhawa'oodoon:aazhawa'ood VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
aazhawewesidoon:aazhawewesid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
aazhideyaakosidoon:aazhideyaakosid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
aazhogewidoon:aazhogewid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
agaasitoon:agaasit VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
agonjidoon:agonjid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
agwaabizotoon:agwaabizot VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
agwanjidoon:agwanjid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
agwatoosidoon:agwatoosid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
ajijisidoon:ajijisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
akowidoon:akowid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
akwaandawidoon:akwaandawid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
ando'adoon:nando'ad VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
angotoon:angot VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
anokiitoon:anokiit VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
ashawesidoon:ashawesid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
asiniiwaakwajitoon:asiniiwaakwajit VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
azhe'adoon:azhe'ad VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
baaboozitoon:baaboozit VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
baapaawibidoon:baapaawibid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
baasikoodoon:baasikood VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
babaamibizonitoon:babaamibizonit VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
badakibidoon:badakibid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
bagosidoon:bagosid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
bakidaakogoodoon:bakidaakogood VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
bakwaakwakamigibidoon:bakwaakwakamigibid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
banaajisidoon:banaajisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
bashigibidoon:bashigibid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
bazagokadoon:bazagokad VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
bezhigoosidoon:bezhigoosid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
bigishkikoodoon:bigishkikood VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
biigojiisidoon:biigojiisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
biimaskobidoon:biimaskobid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
biindaabiigisidoon:biindaabiigisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
biinzibadoon:biinzibad VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
biitoon:biit VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
biiwisidoon:biiwisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
bimaakwisidoon:bimaakwisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
bimiwidoon:bimiwid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
bishagaakobidoon:bishagaakobid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
biskaabiisidoon:biskaabiisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
bookobidoon:bookobid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
boozikitoon:boozikit VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
daangisidoon:daangisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
dadaakwegitoon:dadaakwegit VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
dakagwinjidoon:dakagwinjid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
dakwaabiigitoon:dakwaabiigit VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
datakobidoon:datakobid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
debaabaawadoon:debaabaawad VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
dibaabiishkoodoon:dibaabiishkood VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
diitibibidoon:diitibibid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
dwaabidoon:dwaabid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
gaapibidoon:gaapibid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
gagaanwaabiigibidoon:gagaanwaabiigibid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
gakakibidoon:gakakibid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
gashkiigibidoon:gashkiigibid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
gibaabowesidoon:gibaabowesid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
gidimaagitoon:gidimaagit VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
giishkapidoon:giishkapid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
giiwitaakidoon:giiwitaakid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
gijiigisidoon:gijiigisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
ginwaakotoon:ginwaakot VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
gizhibaayaasidoon:gizhibaayaasid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
godashkinadoon:godashkinad VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
gopiiwidoon:gopiiwid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
gwayakomotoon:gwayakomot VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
gwekwekisidoon:gwekwekisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
inaabiigisidoon:inaabiigisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
inagwinjidoon:inagwinjid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
inishkoodoon:inishkood VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
ishpaabiigibidoon:ishpaabiigibid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
izhinaagotoon:izhinaagot VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
jekaagonesidoon:jekaagonesid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
jiishibidoon:jiishibid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
maajiishkaatoon:maajiishkaat VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
maamawoopidoon:maamawoopid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
maawandoopidoon:awandoopid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
madwewetoon:madwewet VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
mamiskokamigitoon:mamiskokamigit VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
mashkawaakwajidoon:mashkawaakwajid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
mazinapidoon:mazinapid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
michaatoon:michaat VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
miinwegibidoon:miinwegibid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
minomaagotoon:minomaagot VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
mookaagonagibidoon:mookaagonagibid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
na'aabikisidoon:na'aabikisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
naabishkinatoon:naabishkinat VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
naanaazhibidoon:naanaazhibid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
naasaabitoon:naasaabit VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
nabagiboodoon:nabagibood VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
nakwebidoon:nakwebid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
nandoobiigibidoon:nandoobiigibid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
neshangisidoon:neshangisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
niigobidoon:niigobid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
niiwoosidoon:niiwoosid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
niminaawa'oodoon:niminaawa'ood VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
nisaabaawadoon:nisaabaawad VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
nitaawigitoon:nitaawigit VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
nookisidoon:nookisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
noosookagonjidoon:noosookagonjid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
ojibwewisidoon:ojibwewisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
ombaasindoon:ombaasind VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
onagoodoon:onagood VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
ondamiwidoon:ondamiwid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
onzaamashkinadoon:onzaamashkinad VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
ozhiitaatoon:ozhiitaat VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
waanaamikisidoon:waanaamikisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
wanaabikibidoon:wanaabikibid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
wawaawashkaabiigisidoon:wawaawashkaabiigisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
webiboodoon:webibood VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
wiijiindatoon:wiijiindat VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
wiinaabikitoon:wiinaabikit VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
zaagaatebidoon:zaagaatebid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
zaagisidoon:zaagisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
zagakiigisidoon:zagakiigisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
zhaaboshkoodoon:zhaaboshkood VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
zhaazhiibiigibidoon:zhaazhiibiigibid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
zhegwaakosidoon:zhegwaakosid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
zhiigoboodoon:zhiigobood VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
zhingisidoon:zhingisid VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
ziigibadoon:ziigibad VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
ziiwiskitoon:ziiwiskit VTI_Class=VTI_oo_Boundary ;
